Utah statutes.
67-8-6.   Legislative fiscal analyst performing administrative functions for
commission -- Employment of professional assistance -- Assistance of state
agencies -- Publication of reports.
Administration, budgeting, procurement, and related management functions for
the commission shall be performed by the legislative fiscal analyst. The
commission is, however, authorized to employ professional assistance if deemed
necessary and to request assistance from any agency or institution of the
state. It may also prepare, publish, and distribute from time to time reports
of its studies and recommendations and statements in support of its
recommendations.
